apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON 				ಹಿಡಿ__v!catch
%<v%>%<fut%>%<imp%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>: # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<pii%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದು # ;
%<v%>%<inf%>%<vpt%>%<neg%>:ದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ದನು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mf%>:ದಿದ್ದರು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mf%>:ದಿರುವ # ;
%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಯುವ # ;
%<v%>%<inf%>%<pp%>:ಯಲಾಗಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಯ bahudu ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಯುತ್ತದೆ # ;!ಕಲಿತರು
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ತರು # ;!kalitaru
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಯಿತು # ;



%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಬರುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ದರು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<mf%>:ದರು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಕೊಂಡು # ;!ತೆಗೆ
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ದುಕೊಂಡ # ;!ಯುತ್ತಿದ್ದಾರೆ
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ದುಕೊಳ್ಳುತ್ತದೆ # ;

%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಯುತ್ತಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಯಲಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಯಲಾಯಿತು # ;



%<v%>%<ger%>%<nom%>:ಯುವುದು # ;!

%<v%>%<pii%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಬಂದಿಲ್ಲ # ;
!

%<v%>%<past%>%<cause%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಸಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಕೊಳ್ಳುವ # ;!Past adverbial 

%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಕೊಂಡು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ದುಕೊಂಡರು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ದುಕೊಂಡಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಕೊಳ್ಳ loo ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದುಕೊಳ್ಳಲ loo ;

%<v%>%<cause%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಸುತ್ತದೆ # ;!ಸುತ್ತವೆ
%<v%>%<cause%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಸುತ್ತವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<cause%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ಸಿದ್ದಾನೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<cause%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಸುವ # ;!
%<v%>%<cause%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಸಿದರು # ;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ಸುತ್ತಾನೆ # ;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ಸಲಾಗಿದೆ # ;

%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಯ loo ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಯ ಪಡು__vaux ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ದುಬಂದಿದೆ # ;!

%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ದ illa ;


LEXICON ಕೊಂಡು__v
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳ್ಳ loo;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಂಡು #;
%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳ್ಳುವ #;!present-fut adj part


LEXICON 				ಕಾಣು__v!see
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಂಡು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಂಡರು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>%<cni%>:ಂಡರೂ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಂಡವು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಂಡರು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಳ್ಳುವ # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಂಡ # ;!
%<v%>%<refl%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಳ್ಳುತ್ತದೆ # ;!ಕಂಡುಬರುವುದಿಲ್ಲ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಿಸುವ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂಡಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣುವ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ಂಡ # ;!ಕಾಣುವುದಾಗಲೀ
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಬಹುದು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣುವುದು # ;!ಾಣಬರುತ್ತವೆ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಬರುತ್ತವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>%<cni%>:ವುದಾಗಲೀ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಣುತ್ತವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಣುತ್ತೇವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಿಸುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಸಿಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;



%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬರುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬರುವ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಂಡುಬರುವ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಂಡುಬರುವುದ illa ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬಂದಿವೆ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಬರುವ # ;!baruva
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಬರುತ್ತದೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬರುತ್ತವೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬಂದಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬಂತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬಂದವು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>%<cni%>:ಂಡುಬಂದರೂ # ;



%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಿಸಿ kondu  ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಂಡಿತು # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಂಡಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಂಡು # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಿಸಿಕೊಳ್ಳುತ್ತವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಕೊಳ್ಳ loo ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಂಡುಕೊಂಡರು # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಂಡುಕೊಂಡ # ;


%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣಬಹುದಾಗಿದೆ # ;!

%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬಂದಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂಡುಬಂದ # ;

%<v%>%<pres%>%<neg%>:ಾಣದ # ;

%<v%>%<ger%>:ಾಣುವುದ illa ;!

%<v%>%<past%>%<neg%>:ಾಣಲಿಲ್ಲ # ;


%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣುವುದ aagi__com  ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣ loo ;

%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:Golisu__v ;

%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಣು ante ;

%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಣಸಿಗುತ್ತವೆ # ;!

%<v%>%<adject%>%<cni%>:ಂಡರೆ # ;


LEXICON 				ಕೇಳಿ__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳಿ # ;!Past adverbial participle
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳಿದ # ;!Past adjectival participle
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳ loo ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳಿದ aaga ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳುವ #;!

LEXICON 				ಕುಳಿತು__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಳಿತುಿ # ;

LEXICON ನಿಂತು__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲ್ಲುವ # ;!Present-future adjectival prtpl
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಂತಿತು # ;!Present-future adjectival prtpl
%<v%>%<past%>%<cause%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲ್ಲಿಸ loo;!Present-future adjectival prtpl


LEXICON 	 			ಬಿಡುಗಡೆ__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಯಾಯಿತು # ;

LEXICON 				ಹೋದ__v
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>%<cni%>:ದರೆ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>: ante  ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ರಟು # ;


LEXICON 				loo
%+to%<adv%>:ಲು #;
%+to%<adv%>:ಲ oo__inc_clit;

LEXICON 				o-clit
%+o%<interr%>%<clit%>:ೋ #;

LEXICON NounRoot
ನಿಂತು:ನಿ  								ನಿಂತು__v;
ಬಿಡುಗಡೆ:ಬಿಡುಗಡೆ 							ಬಿಡುಗಡೆ__v;
ಕೊಂಡು:ಕೊ 								ಕೊಂಡು__v;
ಮೊದಲ್ಗೊಂಡು:ಮೊದಲ್ಗೊ 					ಕೊಂಡು__v;
ಕೇಳು:ಕೇ 									ಕೇಳಿ__v;
ಕುಳಿತು:ಕು									ಕುಳಿತು__v;
ಹೋದ:ಹೋ 								ಹೋದ__v;
